Washington statutes.
RCW 21.35.030

Designation of a TOD or POD beneficiary—Effect on ownership—Cancellation or change.

The designation of a TOD or POD beneficiary on a registration in beneficiary form has no effect on ownership of the security until the owner's death, or on community property rights and obligations of owners. A registration of a security in beneficiary form may be canceled or changed at any time by the sole owner or all then surviving owners, without the consent of the beneficiary.

[ 1993 c 287 s 6.]